Maryland, session 2026, HB0291.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–1E–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0291*

HOUSE BILL 291
(h) (1) “Proceeds” means the amount of money wagered on a sporting event,
less:
[(1)] (I) the amount returned to successful bettors;
[(2)] (II) the cash equivalents of any merchandise or thing of value
awarded as a prize to successful bettors; AND
[(3) free bets and promotional credits redeemed by bettors; and
(4)] (III) all excise taxes paid by a sports wagering licensee in accordance
with federal law.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH,
“PROCEEDS” DOES NOT INCLUDE MONEY GIVEN AWAY BY A SPORTS WAGERING
LICENSEE AS FREE PROMOTIONAL PLAY AND USED BY PLAYERS TO BET ON A
SPORTING EVENT.
(II) AFTER THE FIRST FULL FISCAL YEAR OF OPERATIONS, THE
EXCLUSION SPECIFIED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT
EXCEED A PERCENTAGE, ESTABLISHED BY THE COMMISSION BY REGULATION, OF:
1. THE TOTAL SPORTS WAGERING PROCEEDS RETAINED
BY THE SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE IN THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR UNDER
§ 9–1E–12(B)(1)(II) OR (III) OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
2. THE TOTAL ONLINE SPORTS WAGERING PROCEEDS
RETAINED BY THE MOBILE SPORTS WAGERING LICENSEE IN THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR
UNDER § 9–1E–12(B)(1)(IV) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.